Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 CORRECTIVE PROVISIONS 2 Section 1. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph a, 3 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), if 4 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 14, are 5 amended to read as follows: 6 (a) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 7 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 8 (b) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 9 December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 10 thousand dollars. 11 Sec. 2. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph c, 12 subparagraphs (1) and (2), if enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House 13 File 2635, section 14, are amended to read as follows: 14 (1) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 15 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 16 (2) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 17 December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 18 thousand dollars. 19 Sec. 3. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph e, 20 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), if 21 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 14, are 22 amended to read as follows: 23 (a) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 24 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 25 (b) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 26 December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 27 thousand dollars. 28 Sec. 4. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph f, 29 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), if 30 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 14, are 31 amended to read as follows: 32 (a) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 33 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 34 (b) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 35 -1- LSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh 1/ 9 H.F. _____ December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 1 thousand dollars. 2 Sec. 5. Section 135C.6, subsection 1, paragraph b, as 3 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 572, section 2, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 b. A supported community living service, as defined in 6 section 225C.21 249A.38B , is not required to be licensed under 7 this chapter , but is subject to approval under section 225C.21 8 249A.38B in order to receive public funding. 9 Sec. 6. Section 135S.1, subsection 2, if enacted by 2026 10 Iowa Acts, House File 571, section 2, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 2. âDiscriminationâ means an adverse action, including but 13 not limited to any penalty, disciplinary, or retaliatory action 14 taken against, or a threat of adverse action communicated 15 to, a medical practitioner or health care institution as a 16 result of the refusal of the medical practitioner or health 17 care institution to participate in a health care service 18 on the basis of conscience. â Discriminationâ not does not 19 include the negotiation or purchase of insurance or a health 20 care service by a nongovernmental entity or individual, the 21 refusal to use or purchase insurance or a health care service 22 by a nongovernmental entity or individual, or a health care 23 institutionâs good-faith effort to accommodate a medical 24 practitionerâs or health care institutionâs exercise of 25 conscience. 26 Sec. 7. Section 135S.2, subsection 1, paragraph a, if 27 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 571, section 3, is 28 amended to read as follows: 29 a. A medical practitioner or health care institution has 30 the right not to participate in or pay for a health care 31 service that violates the medical practitionerâs or health 32 care institutionâs conscience. A medical practitioner shall 33 inform the medical practitionerâs employer of the nature 34 of the medicalâs medical practitionerâs objection based on 35 -2- LSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh 2/ 9 H.F. _____ the practitionerâs conscience. This paragraph shall not be 1 construed to waive or modify a duty a medical practitioner or 2 health care institution may have to participate in a health 3 care service that does not violate the medical practitionerâs 4 conscience. 5 Sec. 8. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2562, section 10, if 6 enacted, is amended by striking the section and inserting in 7 lieu thereof the following: 8 SEC. 10. Section 144H.1, subsection 6, as enacted in section 9 1 of this Act, is amended by striking the subsection and 10 inserting in lieu thereof the following: 11 6. âPerson authorized to consentâ means an individual, 12 in the same order of priority prescribed in section 144A.7, 13 subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , who shall be guided by the express 14 or implied intentions of the patient and who is reasonably 15 available, willing, and competent to consent, refuse to 16 consent, or withdraw consent on a patientâs behalf. 17 Sec. 9. Section 148.11A, subsection 2, paragraph b, as 18 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2184, section 3, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 b. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 21 set the term of an administrative medicine license, but shall 22 not require an administrative medicine license to be renewed 23 more often than once every three years. An administrative 24 medicine license shall expire on the licenseeâs birthday. 25 Sec. 10. Section 256C.4, subsection 1A, paragraph b, if 26 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2754, section 87, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , 29 and each succeeding fiscal year, of the amount of state 30 preschool funding received by a community-based provider 31 approved to directly participate in the preschool program for 32 a fiscal year, not more than five percent may be used by the 33 community-based provider for administering the approved local 34 program. Outreach activities and rent for facilities not owned 35 -3- LSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh 3/ 9 H.F. _____ by the community-based provider are permissive uses of the 1 administrative funds. 2 Sec. 11. Section 280.37, subsection 3, if enacted by 2026 3 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2086, section 4, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 3. If the board of directors of a school district or the 6 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school offer 7 the elective junior fire fighter program, then the board of 8 directors of the school district or the authorities in charge 9 of the accredited nonpublic school shall coordinate with a 10 local fire department to ensure students are provided with the 11 appropriate materials and training to successfully complete 12 all components necessary for fire fighter firefighter I 13 certification, including the written certification examination 14 and the practical certification examination. 15 Sec. 12. Section 280.37, subsection 4, paragraph a, if 16 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2086, section 4, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 a. Be designed to prepare students to sit for certification 19 testing from the fire service training bureau for fire fighter 20 firefighter I certification. 21 Sec. 13. Section 307.22A, subsection 6, if enacted by 2026 22 Iowa Acts, House File 2667, section 2, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 6. The statewide urban design and specifications board 25 shall publish on the Iowa state university of science and 26 technologyâs internet site an analysis of any changes made 27 to the statewide urban design and specifications manuals and 28 provide an estimate of expected cost variations that are likely 29 to be incurred, if any, by implementing the changes. 30 Sec. 14. Section 452A.33, subsection 1, paragraph c, 31 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, as amended by 2026 Iowa Acts, 32 House File 2643, section 5, is amended to read as follows: 33 (2) (a) If a retail dealer fails to file a timely filed 34 report as required by this subsection or fails to maintain 35 -4- LSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh 4/ 9 H.F. _____ records required to file the report , the department may impose 1 a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars per 2 occurrence in addition to any other penalty provided by law. 3 The penalty amount shall be deposited into the general fund of 4 the state. 5 (b) A retail dealer who fails to timely file a timely 6 filed report as required by this subsection for the latest 7 determination period ending on or before the last day of the 8 retail dealerâs tax year is also ineligible to claim any tax 9 credit available under section 422.11O, 422.11P, or 422.11Y for 10 the tax year. 11 Sec. 15. Section 514F.8D, subsection 5, if enacted by 2026 12 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 4, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 5. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 15 chapter 17A to administer and enforce this section. 16 Sec. 16. Section 537C.9, as enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House 17 File 2497, section 9, is amended to read as follows: 18 537C.9 Program agreement ââ approved parties. 19 1. A program shall only enter into a program agreement with 20 the following persons: 21 1. a. A resident of this state who holds a driverâs license 22 issued in this state that authorizes the person to operate a 23 vehicle of the class of the shared vehicle that is the subject 24 of the program agreement. 25 2. b. A nonresident of this state who holds a driverâs 26 license issued by the state or country of the personâs 27 residence that authorizes the person to operate a vehicle of 28 the class of the shared vehicle that is the subject of the 29 program agreement, and is at least the minimum age required by 30 this state to operate a vehicle of that class. 31 3. c. A person who is specifically authorized by this state 32 to operate a vehicle of the class of the shared vehicle that is 33 the subject of the program agreement. 34 4. 2. A program shall keep permanent records of all of the 35 -5- LSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh 5/ 9 H.F. _____ following: 1 a. The names and address of each shared vehicle driver. 2 b. The driverâs license number and place of issuance of each 3 shared vehicle driver, and any other person who may operate a 4 shared vehicle under a program agreement. 5 Sec. 17. Section 910.2, subsection 3, as enacted by 2026 6 Iowa Acts, House File 2697, section 1, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 3. Notwithstanding any other statute or rule of law, with 9 the consent of the defendant and the prosecuting attorney, the 10 court may order as part of the dismissal of a public offense 11 or violation of an ordinance that the defendant pay pecuniary 12 damages to the victim , and category âBâ restitution, which 13 shall include court costs. 14 Sec. 18. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2739, section 13, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 SEC. 13. TEMPORARY PROVISIONS FOR THE HEALTH CARE-RELATED 17 TAX AND PREPAYMENTS FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2026. Notwithstanding 18 section 432B.2, subsection 1, if enacted by this division 19 of this Act, each health care maintenance organization 20 transacting business in this state shall be subject to a health 21 care-related tax payable to the director of revenue in an 22 amount equal to three and one-half percent of the applicable 23 percentage of taxable funds as defined in section 432B.1, 24 if enacted by this division of this Act, for the period in 25 calendar year beginning January 1, 2026, and ending September 26 30, 2026. The difference between the amount of taxes collected 27 pursuant to this section and the amount of tax that would be 28 collected by imposing the rate under section 432B.2, subsection 29 1, if enacted by this division of this Act, shall not be 30 subject to prepayment under section 432B.3, subsection 1 2 , if 31 enacted by this division of this Act. 32 Sec. 19. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2757, sections 5 and 6, 33 if enacted, are amended to read as follows: 34 SEC. 5. APPLICABILITY. Except as otherwise provided, this 35 -6- LSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh 6/ 9 H.F. _____ Act applies to tangible personal property or specified digital 1 projects products sold to or of services furnished to a nuclear 2 electric generation facility when permissible under section 3 423.3, subsection 111, paragraph âcâ, if enacted by this Act. 4 SEC. 6. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 5 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tangible personal 6 property or specified digital projects products sold to or of 7 services furnished to a nuclear electric generation facility 8 that is undertaking an activity described in section 423.3, 9 subsection 111, paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (1), subparagraph 10 subdivision (i), if enacted by this Act. 11 Sec. 20. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 12 immediate importance, take effect upon enactment: 13 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 14 256C.4, subsection 1A, paragraph âbâ. 15 2. The section of this division of this Act amending 2026 16 Iowa Acts, House File 2739, section 13. 17 Sec. 21. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following applies 18 retroactively to the effective date of 2026 Iowa Acts, House 19 File 2754, if enacted: 20 The section of this division of this Act amending section 21 256C.4, subsection 1A, paragraph âbâ. 22 Sec. 22. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following applies 23 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 24 or after that date: 25 The section of this division of this Act amending 2026 Iowa 26 Acts, House File 2739, section 13. 27 DIVISION II 28 LIFE INSURANCE ââ CODE ORGANIZATION 29 Sec. 23. Section 508.101, unnumbered paragraph 1, as 30 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2232, section 4, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 As used in this chapter subchapter , unless the context 33 otherwise requires: 34 Sec. 24. Section 508.102, subsection 2, as enacted by 2026 35 -7- LSB 6973YC (2) 91 ns/jh 7/ 9 H.F. _____ Iowa Acts, House File 2232, section 5, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 2. An insurer or qualified individual who, acting 3 reasonably and in good faith, makes a disclosure of information 4 to the commissioner pursuant to this chapter subchapter or 5 under chapter 507E shall be immune from administrative or civil 6 liability that might otherwise arise from such disclosure or 7 from a failure to notify the eligible adult of the disclosure. 8 This section shall not abrogate or modify any existing 9 statutory or common law privileges or immunities. 10 Sec. 25. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2232, section 10, is 11 amended to read as follows: 12 SEC. 10. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is 13 directed to shall designate sections 508.1 through 508.39 , as 14 amended by this Act, as subchapter I of chapter 508 entitled 15 âGeneral Provisionsâ, and to designate sections 508.101 through 16 508.106, as enacted by this Act, as subchapter II of chapter 17 508 entitled âFinancial Exploitation of Eligible Adultsâ , and 18 replace references to âthis chapterâ with âthis subchapterâ 19 within sections 508.1 through 508.39 . The Code editor shall 20 replace references to chapter 508 with references to chapter 21 508, subchapter I, in sections 235F.1, 423.3, 506.14, 507.1, 22 507.12, 507B.4C, 508A.1, 508A.5, 508B.1, 509.5, 510.11, 511.8, 23 511.26, 514A.1, 514G.103, 515.1, 515B.2, 515B.9, 518C.10, 24 521.1, 521A.1, 521A.14, 521E.1, 521F.2, 521I.1, 522B.1, 522F.1, 25 533C.103, and 535.8, and any other section of the Code or 26 enacted legislation if there appears to be no doubt as to the 27 intent to refer to chapter 508, subchapter I, and the change 28 would not be contrary to or inconsistent with the purposes of 29 this Act or other provision of law. 30